District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-3406

Annual payment by the United States — Appropriation authorization.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 813, Pub. L. 93-198, title V, § 502
Aug. 29, 1994, 88 Stat. 793, Pub. L. 93-395, § 1(7)
Aug. 6, 1981, 95 Stat. 150, Pub. L. 97-30
Oct. 15, 1982, 96 Stat. 1626, Pub. L. 97-34
Aug. 2, 1983, 97 Stat. 367, Pub. L. 98-65
June 12, 1984, 98 Stat. 242, Pub. L. 98-316
Nov. 8, 1984, 98 Stat. 3369, Pub. L. 98-621, § 9(c)(2)
Dec. 12, 1989, 103 Stat. 1901, Pub. L. 101-223, § 2(a)
Aug. 17, 1991, 105 Stat. 495, Pub. L. 102-102, § 2(a)
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 777, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11601(a)(1)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-3406.
1973 Ed., § 47-2501d.

Effective Dates

Pub. L. 105-33, title XI, § 11721, Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 786, provided:
“Sec. 11721. Effective Date. Except as otherwise provided in this title, provisions of this title shall take effect on the later of October 1, 1997, or the day the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority certifies that the financial plan and budget for the District government for fiscal year 1998 meet the requirements of section 201(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Act of 1995, as amended by this title.”

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to Public Law 101-223, for the Pilot Police Corps Program, see Mayor’s Order 90-131, October 5, 1990.

Editor's Notes

This provision is also codified at § 1-205.02

Federal payment to the District of Columbia: Public Law 103-127, 106 Stat. 1341, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1994, provided $38,337,000 for the purpose of eliminating the $331,589,000 general fund accumulated deficit as of September 30, 1990.

Federal payment not subject to apportionment: Section 132 of § 1(c) of Pub. L. 100-202, the D.C. Appropriations Act, 1988, provided that beginning with the fiscal year 1988, amounts appropriated for any fiscal year as the Federal payment to the District of Columbia under § 47-3406, shall not be subject to apportionment and shall be paid by the Secretary of the Treasury to the District of Columbia no later than 15 days after the beginning of the fiscal year for which they are appropriated (or no later than 15 days after the date of the enactment of the appropriating Act, if later).

Appropriations not subject to apportionment: Section 135 of § 1(c) of Pub. L. 100-202, the D.C. Appropriations Act, 1988, provided that Federal funds hereafter appropriated to the District of Columbia government shall not be subject to apportionment except to the extent specifically provided by statute.

Federal payment to the District of Columbia: Public Law 104-194, 110 Stat. 2356, the D.C. Appropriations Act, 1997, provided for payment to the District of Columbia for the fiscal year ending September 30, 1997, $660,000,000.

Public Law 104-194, 110 Stat. 2360, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1997, provided for human support services, $1,685,707,000 and 6,344 full-time equivalent positions (including $961,399,000 and 3,814 full-time equivalent positions from local funds, $676,665,000 and 2,444 full-time equivalent positions from Federal funds, and $47,643,000 and 86 full-time equivalent positions from other funds): Provided, That $24,793,000 of this appropriation, to remain available until expended, shall be available solely for District of Columbia employees’ disability compensation; Provided further, That the District shall not provide free government services such as water, sewer, solid waste disposal or collection, utilities, maintenance, repairs, or similar services to any legally constituted private nonprofit organization (as defined in section 411(5) of Public Law 100-77, approved July 22, 1987) providing emergency shelter services in the District, if the District would not be qualified to receive reimbursement pursuant to the Stewart B. McKinney Homeless Assistance Act, approved July 22, 1987 (101 Stat. 485; Public Law 100-77; 42 U.S.C. 11301 et seq.).

Repayment of loans and interest: Public Law 104-194, 110 Stat. 2360, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1997, provided for reimbursement to the United States of funds loaned in compliance with An Act to provide for the establishment of a modern, adequate, and efficient hospital center in the District of Columbia, approved August 7, 1946 (60 Stat. 896; Public Law 79-648); section 1 of An Act to authorize the Commissioners of the District of Columbia to borrow funds for capital improvement programs and to amend provisions of law relating to Federal Government participation in meeting costs of maintaining the Nation’s Capital City, approved June 6, 1958 (72 Stat. 183; Public Law 85-451, D.C. Code, sec. 10-619); section 4 of An Act to authorize the Commissioners of the District of Columbia to plan, construct, operate and maintain a sanitary sewer to connect the Dulles International Airport with the District of Columbia system, approved June 12, 1960 (74 Stat. 211; Public Law 86-515); section 723 and 743(f) of the District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act of 1973, approved December 24, 1973, as amended (87 Stat. 821; Public Law 93-198; D.C. Code, section 1-204.61, note; 91 Stat. 1156, Public Law 95-131; D.C. Code, sec. 10-619, note), including interest as required thereby, $333,710,000 from local funds.